Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1817
Coroner; duties; performance by sheriff.

When there is no coroner, and in case of the coroner's absence or inability to act, the sheriff of the county is authorized to discharge the duties of coroner in relation to dead bodies.

Laws 1879, § 112, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 5679;

C.S.1922, § 5009;

C.S.1929, § 26-1518;

R.S.1943, § 23-1817;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 79.